Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 5. City Sales and Use Tax.

Sec. 29.45.700.
Power of levy.

A city in a borough that levies and collects areawide sales and use taxes may levy sales and use taxes on all sources taxed by the borough in the manner provided for boroughs. Except as provided in (d) and (e) of this section, the assembly may by ordinance authorize a city to levy and collect sales and use taxes on other sources.

A city in a borough that does not levy and collect sales and use taxes for areawide borough functions may levy and collect sales and use taxes in the manner provided for boroughs.

A city outside a borough may levy and collect sales and use taxes in the manner provided for boroughs.

A city that levies and collects sales and use taxes under (a) of this section may not levy and collect a sales tax on a purchase made with (1) food coupons, food stamps, or other types of allotments issued under 7 U.S.C. 2011 — 2036 (Food Stamp Program); or (2) food instruments, food vouchers, or other type of certificate issued under 42 U.S.C. 1786 (Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children). For purposes of this subsection, the value of a food stamp allotment paid in the form of a wage subsidy as authorized under AS

47.25.975(b)

is not considered to be an allotment issued under 7 U.S.C. 2011 — 2036 (Food Stamp Program). This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

A city that levies and collects sales and use taxes may not levy and collect a sales or use tax on (1) the physical transfer of refined fuel, unless the transfer is made in connection with a sale or use in the city, or (2) wholesale sales or transfers of fuel refined in the city. A sale is in the city if the fuel is delivered to the buyer in the city. A use is in the city if the fuel is consumed in the city. This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

The prohibitions on the levy and collection of a sales or use tax on refined fuel in (e) of this section do not apply to a city if, on September 16, 2003, the city is

levying and collecting a sales or use tax on the sale, use, or transfer of refined fuel under an ordinance adopted before January 1, 2003; or

receiving payments in lieu of a sales or use tax on the sale, use, or transfer of refined fuel under an agreement entered into before January 1, 2003.

A city may not levy or collect a sales or use tax on a construction contract awarded by the state or a state agency, or on a subcontract awarded in connection with the project funded under the construction contract. This subsection applies to home rule and general law cities.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 1986; am §§ 51, 52 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 20 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 69 SLA 2002; am §§ 6, 7 ch 117 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 2005)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective September 16, 2003, added a subsection reference in subsection (a) and added subsections (e) and (f).

The 2005 amendment, effective July 20, 2005, added subsection (g).

Sec. 29.45.710.
Combining sales and use tax with incorporation of a second class city.

A petition for incorporation of a second class city may request that a sales and use tax proposal be placed on the same ballot.
The petition must state the proposed tax rate. The petition may request that incorporation be dependent on the passage of the tax proposition. If so, the incorporation proposition fails if the tax fails.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)